Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-287
Election of directors by certain classes
of shareholders.

(MBCA
8.04) If the articles of incorporation authorize dividing the shares into
classes, the articles may also authorize the election of all or a specified
number of directors by the holders of one or more authorized classes of shares.
A class, or classes, of shares entitled to elect one or more directors is
a separate voting group for purposes of the election of directors.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 87.